Maine, session 132, LD1870.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA c. 3-C is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 3-C
MAINE CLIMATE SUPERFUND
§580-G. Short title
This Act may be known and cited as "the Maine Climate Superfund Act."
§580-H. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Climate change adaptation project. "Climate change adaptation project" means
a project designed to respond to, avoid, moderate, repair or adapt to negative impacts
caused by climate change and to assist human and natural communities, households and
businesses in preparing for future disruptions driven by climate change. "Climate change
adaptation project" includes implementing nature-based solutions and flood protections;
upgrading storm water drainage systems; making defensive upgrades to roads, bridges,
railroads and transportation systems; preparing for and recovering from extreme weather
events; undertaking preventive health care programs and providing medical care to treat
illness or injury caused by the effects of climate change; relocating, elevating or retrofitting
sewage treatment plants and other infrastructure vulnerable to flooding; installing energy
efficient cooling systems and other weatherization and energy efficiency upgrades and
retrofits in public and private buildings, including schools and public housing, designed to
reduce the public health effects of more frequent heat waves and forest fire smoke;
upgrading parts of the electrical grid to increase stability and resilience, including
supporting the creation of microgrids as defined in Title 35-A, section 10129, subsection
1, paragraph H; and responding to toxic algae blooms, loss of agricultural topsoil, crop loss
and other climate-driven ecosystem threats to forests, farms, fisheries and food systems.
2. Climate Superfund Cost Recovery Program. "Climate Superfund Cost Recovery
Program" or "program" means the program established under section 580-I.
3. Coal. "Coal" means bituminous coal, anthracite coal and lignite coal.
4. Controlled group. "Controlled group" means 2 or more entities treated as a single
employer:
A. Under 26 United States Code, Section 52(a) or (b), without regard to 26 United
States Code, Section 1563(b)(2)(C); or
B. Under 26 United States Code, Section 414(m) or (o).
For purposes of this chapter, entities in a controlled group are treated as a single entity for
purposes of subsection 20 and are jointly and severally liable for payment of any cost
recovery demand owed by any entity in the controlled group.
5. Cost recovery demand. "Cost recovery demand" means a charge asserted against
a responsible party for cost recovery payments under the program for payment to the fund.
Page 1 - 132LR2359(01)

6. Covered greenhouse gas emissions. "Covered greenhouse gas emissions" means
the total quantity of greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere during the covered
period, expressed in metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent, resulting from the use of
fossil fuels extracted, produced or refined by an entity.
7. Covered period. "Covered period" means the period that began January 1, 1995
and ended December 31, 2024.
8. Crude oil. "Crude oil" means oil or petroleum of any kind and in any form,
including bitumen, oil sands, heavy oil, conventional and unconventional oil, shale oil,
natural gas liquids, condensates and related fossil fuels.
9. Entity. "Entity" means any individual, trustee, agent, partnership, association,
corporation, company, municipality, political subdivision or other legal organization,
including a foreign nation, that holds or held an ownership interest in a fossil fuel business
during the covered period.
10. Environmental justice. "Environmental justice" means the fair treatment and
meaningful involvement of all people regardless of race, color, national origin or income
with respect to the development, implementation and enforcement of environmental laws,
rules and policies.
11. Fossil fuel. "Fossil fuel" means coal, petroleum products and fuel gases.
12. Fossil fuel business. "Fossil fuel business" means a business engaging in the
extraction of fossil fuels or the refining of petroleum products.
13. Fuel gases. "Fuel gases" means methane, natural gas, liquified natural gas and
manufactured fuel gases.
14. Fund. "Fund" means the Climate Superfund Cost Recovery Program Fund
established pursuant to section 580-K.
15. Greenhouse gas. "Greenhouse gas" has the same meaning as in section 574,
subsection 1.
16. Nature-based solution. "Nature-based solution" means a project that uses or
mimics nature or a natural process and function and that may also offer environmental,
economic and social benefits while increasing resilience. "Nature-based solution" includes
green infrastructure projects that use storm water management practices to preserve, restore
or mimic natural hydrology and natural infrastructure projects that use existing or rebuilt
natural landscapes to increase resilience.
17. Notice of cost recovery demand. "Notice of cost recovery demand" means a
written communication from the department informing a responsible party of the amount
of the cost recovery demand.
18. Petroleum product. "Petroleum product" means any product refined or re-refined
from:
A. Synthetic or crude oil; or
B. Crude oil extracted from natural gas liquids or other sources.
19. Qualifying expenditure. "Qualifying expenditure" means an authorized payment
from the fund to pay reasonable expenses associated with the administration of the fund
Page 2 - 132LR2359(01)

412 and the program and to pay for a climate change adaptation project, including its operation,
423 monitoring and maintenance.
20. Responsible party. "Responsible party" means an entity or a successor in interest
to an entity that during any part of the covered period was engaged in the trade or business
of extracting fossil fuel or refining crude oil and is determined by the department
attributable for more than 1,000,000,000 metric tons of covered greenhouse gas emissions
during the covered period. "Responsible party" does not include a person who lacks
sufficient connection with the State to satisfy the nexus requirements of the United States
Constitution.
21. Strategy. "Strategy" means the resilience implementation strategy adopted by the
department under section 580-L, subsection 3.
§580-I. Climate Superfund Cost Recovery Program
The Climate Superfund Cost Recovery Program is established within and administered
by the department. The purposes of the program are:
1. Compensatory payments. To secure compensatory payments from responsible
parties based on a standard of strict liability to provide a source of revenue for climate
change adaptation projects within the State;
2. Proportional liabilities. To determine proportional liability of responsible parties;
3. Cost recovery demands. To impose cost recovery demands on responsible parties
and issue notices of cost recovery demands;
4. Responsible party payments. To accept and collect payment from responsible
parties;
5. Strategy. To develop, adopt, implement and update the strategy in order to identify
and prioritize climate change adaptation projects; and
6. Funds dispersal. To disperse funds to climate change adaptation projects identified
in the strategy.
§580-J. Liability of responsible parties
1. Responsible party liability. A responsible party is strictly liable for a share of the
costs of climate change adaptation projects and all qualifying expenditures from the fund.
For purposes of this section, entities in a controlled group:
A. Must be treated by the department as a single entity for the purposes of identifying
responsible parties; and
B. Are jointly and severally liable for payment of any cost recovery demand owed by
any entity in the controlled group.
2. Cost recovery demand. With respect to each responsible party, the cost recovery
demand is equal to an amount that bears the same ratio to the cost to the State and its
residents, as calculated by the Treasurer of State, from the emission of covered greenhouse
gases during the covered period as the responsible party's applicable share of covered
greenhouse gas emissions bears to the aggregate applicable shares of covered greenhouse
gas emissions resulting from the use of fossil fuels extracted or refined during the covered
period.
Page 3 - 132LR2359(01)

3. Minority interest. If a responsible party owns a minority interest of 10% or more
in another entity, the responsible party's applicable share of covered greenhouse gas
emissions is increased by the applicable share of covered greenhouse gas emissions for the
entity in which the responsible party holds a minority interest multiplied by the percentage
of the minority interest held by the responsible party.
4. Greenhouse gas emissions. The department shall use the best available
information, including but not limited to the United States Environmental Protection
Agency's emissions factors for greenhouse gas inventories as applied to the fossil fuel
volume data, for the purpose of determining the amount of covered greenhouse gas
emissions attributable to any entity from the fossil fuels attributable to the entity.
5. Adjustments. The department may adjust the cost recovery demand amount of a
responsible party who refined petroleum products or who is a successor in interest to an
entity that refines petroleum products if the responsible party establishes to the satisfaction
of the department that:
A. A portion of the cost recovery demand amount was attributable to the refining of
crude oil extracted by another responsible party; and
B. The crude oil extracted by the other entity was accounted for when the department
determined the cost recovery demand amount for the other entity or a successor in
interest to the other entity.
6. Payments; installments. A responsible party shall pay the cost recovery demand
amount in full not later than 6 months following the department's issuance of the cost
recovery demand, except that a responsible party may elect to pay the cost recovery demand
amount in 9 annual installments in accordance with this subsection.
The first installment must be paid not later than 6 months following the department's
issuance of the cost recovery demand and is equal to 20% of the total cost recovery demand
amount. Each subsequent installment must be paid not later than one year from the initial
payment and each subsequent year and must be equal to 10% of the total cost recovery
demand amount. The commissioner may charge reasonable interest on each installment
payment or a delayed payment and, at the commissioner's discretion, may adjust the amount
of a subsequent installment payment or a delayed payment to reflect increases or decreases
in the Consumer Price Index. The unpaid balance of all remaining installments becomes
due immediately if:
A. The responsible party fails to pay any installment in a timely manner, as specified
in department rules;
B. There is a liquidation or sale of substantially all the assets of the responsible party,
except that, in the case of a sale of substantially all the assets of a responsible party,
the remaining installments do not become due immediately if the buyer enters into an
agreement with the department under which the buyer assumes liability for the
remaining installments due under this subsection in the same manner as if the buyer
were the responsible party; or
C. The responsible party ceases to do business.
7. Fund deposits. The department shall deposit cost recovery payments collected
under this chapter into the fund.
Page 4 - 132LR2359(01)

8. Reconsideration. A responsible party aggrieved by the issuance of a notice of cost
recovery demand may file a request for reconsideration with the department within 30 days
following issuance of the notice of cost recovery demand. A request for reconsideration
must state the grounds for the request and include supporting documentation. The
department shall notify the responsible party of the final decision by issuing a subsequent
notice of cost recovery demand. A responsible party aggrieved by the issuance of a final
notice of cost recovery demand under this subsection may bring an action in the Superior
Court of Kennebec County seeking an order annulling, altering or modifying the notice of
cost recovery demand.
9. Construction. This Act may not be construed to relieve any person from liability
at common law or under any state law. This Act may not be construed to preempt, displace,
restrict or limit in any way any other claim or remedy available to a person.
§580-K. Climate Superfund Cost Recovery Program Fund
1. Fund established. The Climate Superfund Cost Recovery Program Fund is
established and is administered by the commissioner to provide funding for climate change
adaptation projects in the State. The fund consists of:
A. Cost recovery payments deposited into the fund under section 580-J;
B. Funds from time to time appropriated to the fund by the Legislature; and
C. Gifts, donations or other funds received from any source, public or private,
dedicated for deposit into the fund and approved by the commissioner.
2. Use of fund. The fund may be used only:
A. To pay qualified expenditures for climate change adaptation projects identified by
the department in the strategy;
B. To pay reasonable administrative costs of the program, including the cost to the
State Auditor associated with hiring technical expertise necessary to complete the
audits required under section 580-M;
C. To implement components of the state climate action plan required under section
577 that are related to climate change adaptation projects; and
D. To reimburse the General Fund for any costs to establish and implement the
program and the fund incurred by the department, the Treasurer of State and the Office
of the Attorney General.
At least 35% of funds expended from the fund must be used for climate change adaptation
projects that benefit persons with median household income and employment below the
statewide median household income and employment rate who have environmental justice
concerns.
3. Unexpended balances and interest. Unexpended balances and interest earned by
the fund must be retained in the fund from year to year.
§580-L. Rulemaking
The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement the requirements of this
chapter, including:
Page 5 - 132LR2359(01)

1. Identification. Adopting methodologies using the best available science and
publicly available data to identify a responsible party and determine a responsible party's
applicable share of covered greenhouse gas emissions;
2. Registration requirements. Requirements for registering an entity that is a
responsible party and issuing a notice of cost recovery demand under the program; and
3. Resilience implementation strategy. Requirements for the adoption of the strategy
under section 580-N, which must include:
A. Practices using nature-based solutions intended to stabilize flood plains, riparian
zones, lake shoreland, wetlands and similar lands;
B. Practices to adapt infrastructure to the effects of climate change;
C. Practices needed to build early warning mechanisms and to support fast, effective
response to climate-related threats;
D. Practices that support economic and environmental sustainability in the face of
changing climate conditions; and
E. Criteria and procedures for prioritizing climate change adaptation projects eligible
to receive funds under the program.
Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
§580-M. Program audit
Beginning January 1, 2031 and every 5 years thereafter, the State Auditor shall evaluate
the operation and effectiveness of the program. The State Auditor shall make
recommendations to the department on ways to increase program efficacy and cost-
effectiveness. The State Auditor shall submit the results of the audit to the joint standing
committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over agriculture, conservation and
forestry matters, environment and natural resources matters and energy, utilities and
technology matters. The State Auditor must be reimbursed from the fund for any costs
associated with hiring technical expertise necessary to complete the audits required under
this section.
§580-N. Resilience implementation strategy
In adopting the strategy, the department shall:
1. Maine Climate Council. Consult with the cochairs of the Maine Climate Council
established in section 577-A and within the Governor's Office of Policy Innovation and the
Future, as well as any relevant working groups;
2. Adaptation needs and vulnerabilities. In consultation with other state agencies,
including the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management, Maine
Emergency Management Agency, assess the adaptation needs and vulnerabilities of various
areas vital to the State's economy and normal functioning and the health and well-being of
residents of the State;
3. Climate change adaptation projects. Identify major potential, proposed and
ongoing climate change adaptation projects throughout the State;
Page 6 - 132LR2359(01)

4. Funding streams. Identify opportunities for alignment with existing federal, state
and local funding streams;
5. Consultation. Consult with stakeholders, including local governments, businesses,
environmental advocates, relevant subject area experts and representatives of low-income
communities or communities with environmental justice concerns pursuant to section
580-K;
6. State climate action plan. Consider components of the state climate action plan
under section 577 that are related to adaptation or resilience; and
7. Public engagement. Conduct public engagement in areas and communities that
have the most significant exposure to the effects of climate change, including
disadvantaged, low-income and rural communities and areas.
This section may not be construed to limit the existing authority of a state agency to
regulate greenhouse gas emissions or establish strategies or adopt rules to mitigate climate
risk and build resilience to climate change.
Sec. 2. Treasurer of State report on cost to State of greenhouse gas
emissions. On or before December 31, 2026, the Treasurer of State shall submit to the
joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over environment and
natural resources matters, energy, utilities and technology matters and judiciary matters an
assessment of the costs to the State of the emission of greenhouse gases for the period that
began on January 1, 1995 and ended on December 31, 2024. The assessment must include:
1. A summary of the various cost-driving effects of greenhouse gas emissions on the
State, including effects on public health, natural resources, biodiversity, agriculture,
economic development, flood preparedness and safety, and any other effect that the
Treasurer of State determines is relevant;
2. A categorized calculation of the costs that have been incurred and are projected to
be incurred by the State of each of the effects identified under subsection 1; and
3. A categorized calculation of the costs that have been incurred and are projected to
be incurred by the State to abate the effects of greenhouse gas emissions from between
January 1, 1995 and December 31, 2024 on the State and residents of the State.
Sec. 3. Cost recovery demands issued. The Department of Environmental
Protection shall issue the cost recovery demands pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 38, chapter 3-C not later than 6 months following the adoption of rules pursuant to
Title 38, section 580-L.